Ohio, session 136, HB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.964 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.964. In addition to any other name prescribed by the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of state route number one hundred twenty-five, between rocky fork road and United States route number fifty-two, in Scioto county, shall be known as the "Al Oliver Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.